src/install/bin/server/open.office31/share/uno_packages/cache/uno_packages/15FF.tmp_/dict-fr.oxt/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX c5 éner èneront/n'q'm't's' éner
SFX c5 éper èperont/n'q'm't's' éper
SFX c5 équer èqueront/n'q'm't's' équer
SFX c5 érer èreront/n'q'm't's' érer
SFX c5 éser èseront/n'q'm't's' éser
SFX c5 éter èteront/n'q'm't's' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètreront/n'q'm't's' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvreront/n'q'm't's' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èyeront/n'q'm't's' éyer
SFX c5 er erais/n'j'm't' er
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerais/n'j'm't' ébrer
SFX c5 écer ècerais/n'j'm't' écer
SFX c5 écher ècherais/n'j'm't' écher
SFX c5 écrer ècrerais/n'j'm't' écrer
SFX c5 éder èderais/n'j'm't' éder
SFX c5 éger ègerais/n'j'm't' éger
SFX c5 égler èglerais/n'j'm't' égler
SFX c5 égner ègnerais/n'j'm't' égner
SFX c5 égrer ègrerais/n'j'm't' égrer
SFX c5 éguer èguerais/n'j'm't' éguer
SFX c5 éler èlerais/n'j'm't' éler
SFX c5 émer èmerais/n'j'm't' émer
SFX c5 éner ènerais/n'j'm't' éner
SFX c5 éper èperais/n'j'm't' éper
SFX c5 équer èquerais/n'j'm't' équer
SFX c5 érer èrerais/n'j'm't' érer
SFX c5 éser èserais/n'j'm't' éser
SFX c5 éter èterais/n'j'm't' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètrerais/n'j'm't' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvrerais/n'j'm't' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èyerais/n'j'm't' éyer
SFX c5 er erais/n'm't' er
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerais/n'm't' ébrer
SFX c5 écer ècerais/n'm't' écer
SFX c5 écher ècherais/n'm't' écher
SFX c5 écrer ècrerais/n'm't' écrer
SFX c5 éder èderais/n'm't' éder
SFX c5 éger ègerais/n'm't' éger
SFX c5 égler èglerais/n'm't' égler
SFX c5 égner ègnerais/n'm't' égner
SFX c5 égrer ègrerais/n'm't' égrer
SFX c5 éguer èguerais/n'm't' éguer
SFX c5 éler èlerais/n'm't' éler
SFX c5 émer èmerais/n'm't' émer
SFX c5 éner ènerais/n'm't' éner
SFX c5 éper èperais/n'm't' éper
SFX c5 équer èquerais/n'm't' équer
SFX c5 érer èrerais/n'm't' érer
SFX c5 éser èserais/n'm't' éser
SFX c5 éter èterais/n'm't' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètrerais/n'm't' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvrerais/n'm't' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èyerais/n'm't' éyer
SFX c5 er erait/n'q'm't's' er
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerait/n'q'm't's' ébrer
SFX c5 écer ècerait/n'q'm't's' écer
SFX c5 écher ècherait/n'q'm't's' écher
SFX c5 écrer ècrerait/n'q'm't's' écrer
SFX c5 éder èderait/n'q'm't's' éder
SFX c5 éger ègerait/n'q'm't's' éger
SFX c5 égler èglerait/n'q'm't's' égler
SFX c5 égner ègnerait/n'q'm't's' égner
SFX c5 égrer ègrerait/n'q'm't's' égrer
SFX c5 éguer èguerait/n'q'm't's' éguer
SFX c5 éler èlerait/n'q'm't's' éler
SFX c5 émer èmerait/n'q'm't's' émer
SFX c5 éner ènerait/n'q'm't's' éner
SFX c5 éper èperait/n'q'm't's' éper
SFX c5 équer èquerait/n'q'm't's' équer
SFX c5 érer èrerait/n'q'm't's' érer
SFX c5 éser èserait/n'q'm't's' éser
SFX c5 éter èterait/n'q'm't's' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètrerait/n'q'm't's' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvrerait/n'q'm't's' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èyerait/n'q'm't's' éyer
SFX c5 er erions/n't' er
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerions/n't' ébrer
SFX c5 écer ècerions/n't' écer
SFX c5 écher ècherions/n't' écher
SFX c5 écrer ècrerions/n't' écrer
SFX c5 éder èderions/n't' éder
SFX c5 éger ègerions/n't' éger
SFX c5 égler èglerions/n't' égler
SFX c5 égner ègnerions/n't' égner
SFX c5 égrer ègrerions/n't' égrer
SFX c5 éguer èguerions/n't' éguer
SFX c5 éler èlerions/n't' éler
SFX c5 émer èmerions/n't' émer
SFX c5 éner ènerions/n't' éner
SFX c5 éper èperions/n't' éper
SFX c5 équer èquerions/n't' équer
SFX c5 érer èrerions/n't' érer
SFX c5 éser èserions/n't' éser
SFX c5 éter èterions/n't' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètrerions/n't' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvrerions/n't' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èyerions/n't' éyer
SFX c5 er eriez/n'm' er
SFX c5 ébrer èbreriez/n'm' ébrer
SFX c5 écer èceriez/n'm' écer
SFX c5 écher ècheriez/n'm' écher
SFX c5 écrer ècreriez/n'm' écrer
SFX c5 éder èderiez/n'm' éder
SFX c5 éger ègeriez/n'm' éger
SFX c5 égler ègleriez/n'm' égler
SFX c5 égner ègneriez/n'm' égner
SFX c5 égrer ègreriez/n'm' égrer
SFX c5 éguer ègueriez/n'm' éguer
SFX c5 éler èleriez/n'm' éler
SFX c5 émer èmeriez/n'm' émer
SFX c5 éner èneriez/n'm' éner
SFX c5 éper èperiez/n'm' éper
SFX c5 équer èqueriez/n'm' équer
SFX c5 érer èreriez/n'm' érer
SFX c5 éser èseriez/n'm' éser
SFX c5 éter èteriez/n'm' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètreriez/n'm' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvreriez/n'm' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èyeriez/n'm' éyer
SFX c5 er eraient/n'q'm't's' er
SFX c5 ébrer èbreraient/n'q'm't's' ébrer
SFX c5 écer èceraient/n'q'm't's' écer
SFX c5 écher ècheraient/n'q'm't's' écher
SFX c5 écrer ècreraient/n'q'm't's' écrer
SFX c5 éder èderaient/n'q'm't's' éder
SFX c5 éger ègeraient/n'q'm't's' éger
SFX c5 égler ègleraient/n'q'm't's' égler
SFX c5 égner ègneraient/n'q'm't's' égner
SFX c5 égrer ègreraient/n'q'm't's' égrer
SFX c5 éguer ègueraient/n'q'm't's' éguer
SFX c5 éler èleraient/n'q'm't's' éler
SFX c5 émer èmeraient/n'q'm't's' émer
SFX c5 éner èneraient/n'q'm't's' éner
SFX c5 éper èperaient/n'q'm't's' éper
SFX c5 équer èqueraient/n'q'm't's' équer
SFX c5 érer èreraient/n'q'm't's' érer
SFX c5 éser èseraient/n'q'm't's' éser
SFX c5 éter èteraient/n'q'm't's' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètreraient/n'q'm't's' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvreraient/n'q'm't's' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èyeraient/n'q'm't's' éyer
SFX c5 ébrer èbre/n'j'm't' ébrer
SFX c5 écer èce/n'j'm't' écer
SFX c5 écher èche/n'j'm't' écher
SFX c5 écrer ècre/n'j'm't' écrer
SFX c5 éder ède/n'j'm't' éder
SFX c5 éger ège/n'j'm't' éger
SFX c5 égler ègle/n'j'm't' égler
SFX c5 égner ègne/n'j'm't' égner
SFX c5 égrer ègre/n'j'm't' égrer
SFX c5 éguer ègue/n'j'm't' éguer
SFX c5 éler èle/n'j'm't' éler
SFX c5 émer ème/n'j'm't' émer
SFX c5 éner ène/n'j'm't' éner
SFX c5 éper èpe/n'j'm't' éper
SFX c5 équer èque/n'j'm't' équer
SFX c5 érer ère/n'j'm't' érer
SFX c5 éser èse/n'j'm't' éser
SFX c5 éter ète/n'j'm't' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètre/n'j'm't' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvre/n'j'm't' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èye/n'j'm't' éyer
SFX c5 ébrer èbres/n'm't' ébrer
SFX c5 écer èces/n'm't' écer
SFX c5 écher èches/n'm't' écher
SFX c5 écrer ècres/n'm't' écrer
SFX c5 éder èdes/n'm't' éder
SFX c5 éger èges/n'm't' éger
SFX c5 égler ègles/n'm't' égler
SFX c5 égner ègnes/n'm't' égner
SFX c5 égrer ègres/n'm't' égrer
SFX c5 éguer ègues/n'm't' éguer
SFX c5 éler èles/n'm't' éler
SFX c5 émer èmes/n'm't' émer
SFX c5 éner ènes/n'm't' éner
SFX c5 éper èpes/n'm't' éper
SFX c5 équer èques/n'm't' équer
SFX c5 érer ères/n'm't' érer
SFX c5 éser èses/n'm't' éser
SFX c5 éter ètes/n'm't' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètres/n'm't' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvres/n'm't' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èyes/n'm't' éyer
SFX c5 ébrer èbre/n'q'm't's' ébrer
SFX c5 écer èce/n'q'm't's' écer
SFX c5 écher èche/n'q'm't's' écher
SFX c5 écrer ècre/n'q'm't's' écrer
SFX c5 éder ède/n'q'm't's' éder
SFX c5 éger ège/n'q'm't's' éger
SFX c5 égler ègle/n'q'm't's' égler
SFX c5 égner ègne/n'q'm't's' égner
SFX c5 égrer ègre/n'q'm't's' égrer
SFX c5 éguer ègue/n'q'm't's' éguer
SFX c5 éler èle/n'q'm't's' éler
SFX c5 émer ème/n'q'm't's' émer
SFX c5 éner ène/n'q'm't's' éner
SFX c5 éper èpe/n'q'm't's' éper
SFX c5 équer èque/n'q'm't's' équer
SFX c5 érer ère/n'q'm't's' érer
SFX c5 éser èse/n'q'm't's' éser
SFX c5 éter ète/n'q'm't's' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètre/n'q'm't's' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvre/n'q'm't's' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èye/n'q'm't's' éyer
SFX c5 er ions/n't' er
SFX c5 er iez/n'm' er
SFX c5 ébrer èbrent/n'q'm't's' ébrer
SFX c5 écer ècent/n'q'm't's' écer
SFX c5 écher èchent/n'q'm't's' écher
SFX c5 écrer ècrent/n'q'm't's' écrer
SFX c5 éder èdent/n'q'm't's' éder
SFX c5 éger ègent/n'q'm't's' éger
SFX c5 égler èglent/n'q'm't's' égler
SFX c5 égner ègnent/n'q'm't's' égner
SFX c5 égrer ègrent/n'q'm't's' égrer
SFX c5 éguer èguent/n'q'm't's' éguer
SFX c5 éler èlent/n'q'm't's' éler
SFX c5 émer èment/n'q'm't's' émer
SFX c5 éner ènent/n'q'm't's' éner
SFX c5 éper èpent/n'q'm't's' éper
SFX c5 équer èquent/n'q'm't's' équer
SFX c5 érer èrent/n'q'm't's' érer
SFX c5 éser èsent/n'q'm't's' éser
SFX c5 éter ètent/n'q'm't's' éter
SFX c5 étrer ètrent/n'q'm't's' étrer
SFX c5 évrer èvrent/n'q'm't's' évrer
SFX c5 éyer èyent/n'q'm't's' éyer
SFX c5 er asse/n'j'm't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 écer éçasse/n'j'm't' écer
SFX c5 éger égeasse/n'j'm't' éger
SFX c5 er asses/n'm't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 écer éçasses/n'm't' écer
SFX c5 éger égeasses/n'm't' éger
SFX c5 er ât/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c5 écer éçât/n'q'm't's' écer
SFX c5 éger égeât/n'q'm't's' éger
